Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201472-1263
State investment
officer; time deposit open account; conditions.

Except as provided in section 72-1264, the state
investment officer shall, out of funds available for investment, initially cause to be offered
to all banks, capital stock financial institutions, and qualifying mutual
financial institutions in this state a time deposit open account in the amount
of one million dollars, except that the minimum amount that any bank, capital
stock financial institution, or qualifying mutual financial institution may
accept is the amount of one hundred thousand dollars. Such deposit shall be
available at any investment date to such banks, capital stock financial institutions,
or qualifying mutual financial institutions as are willing to meet the rate
and other requirements set forth in the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and
make application therefor. No deposit shall be made when doing so would violate
a fiduciary obligation of the state or section 72-1268.07. To the extent that the total amount of funds initially offered
to all banks, capital stock financial institutions, and qualifying mutual
financial institutions is not accepted by such banks, capital stock financial
institutions, and qualifying mutual financial institutions, the balance of
such funds shall be immediately reoffered to any banks, capital stock financial
institutions, and qualifying mutual financial institutions desiring additional
funds in an amount not to exceed each bank's, capital stock financial institution's,
or qualifying mutual financial institution's pro rata share of the remaining
funds, or five million dollars for each bank, capital stock financial institution,
or qualifying mutual financial institution, whichever is less. The reoffered
funds shall be made available to such banks, capital stock financial institutions,
and qualifying mutual financial institutions as are willing to meet the rate
and other requirements set forth in the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act. All
funds not investable under this section shall be invested as provided by section
72-1246. No one bank, capital stock financial institution, or qualifying mutual
financial institution may receive for deposit a sum of more than six million dollars.

Laws 1978, LB 258, § 3;

Laws 1985, LB 614, § 2;

Laws 1990, LB 1146, § 3;

Laws 2000, LB 932, § 35;

Laws 2002, LB 957, § 26;

Laws 2003, LB 175, § 4;

Laws 2014, LB759, § 20.